en: Citric acids, Citric acid
af: Sitroensuur
ar: حمض الليمون
az: Limon turşusu
be: Лімонная кіслата
bg: Лимонена киселина
bn: সাইট্রিক অ্যাসিড
bs: Limunska kiselina
ca: Àcid cítric
cs: Kyselina citronová
cy: Asid sitrig
da: Citronsyrer
de: Citronensäuren
el: Κιτρικό οξύ
eo: Citrata acidoj
es: Ácido cítrico
et: Sidrunhape
eu: Azido zitriko
fa: سیتریک اسید
fi: Sitruunahappo
fr: Acide citrique
ga: Aigéad citreach
gl: Ácido cítrico
hi: सिट्रिक अम्ल
hr: Limunska kiselina
hu: Citromsav
hy: Կիտրոնաթթու
id: Asam sitrat
is: Sítrónusýra
it: Acido citrico
ja: クエン酸
jv: Asem sitrat
ka: ლიმონმჟავა
kk: Лимон қышқылы
kn: ಸಿಟ್ರಿಕ್ ಆಮ್ಲ
ko: 시트르산
ky: Лимон кислотасы
la: Acidum citricum
lb: Zitrounesaier
lt: Citrinų rūgštis
lv: Citronskābe
mi: Waikawa rēmana
mk: Лимонска киселина
ml: സിട്രിക് ആസിഡ്
ms: Asid sitrik
mt: Aċidu ċitriku
nb: Sitronsyrer
nl: Citroenzuur
nn: Sitronsyrer
os: Лимоны туагад
pa: ਸਿਟਰਿਕ ਤੇਜ਼ਾਬ
pl: Kwas cytrynowy
pt: Ácido cítrico
ro: Acid citric
ru: Лимонная кислота
sh: Limunska kiselina
sk: Kyselina citrónová
sl: Citronska kislina
sr: Лимунска киселина, Limunska kiselina
sv: Citronsyror
ta: சிட்ரிக் அமிலம்
te: సిట్రిక్ ఆమ్లం
tr: Sitrik asit
tt: Лимун әчелеге
uk: Лимонна кислота
ur: سٹرک تیزاب
uz: Limon kislota
vi: Axít citric
wa: Seur di citron
yi: סיטריק זויער
zh: 柠檬酸, 檸檬酸

en: Food colorings, Food dyes, Color additives, Food colourings, Food coloring, Food colouring
de: Lebensmittelfarbe, Lebensmittelfarbstoffe
es: Colorantes alimentarios, Colorantes
fi: elintarvikevärit
fr: Colorants alimentaires, Colorant alimentaire, colorant, Colorants alimentaire
hr: Prehrambene boje
it: Coloranti alimentari
ja: 着色料
lt: Maistiniai dažai
nl: Voedingskleurstoffen
pl: Barwnik spozywczy
zh: 食用色素, 食用染料

fr: Colorants pour oeufs, colorant pour oeufs
de: Eierfärben
es: Colorantes para huevos, colorante para huevos
it: Coloranti per uova, colorante per uova
lt: Kiaušinių dažai, dažiklis kiaušiniams
nl: Eierverven
zh: 蛋类着色剂, 蛋类染料

en: Flavour enhancers
de: Geschmacksverstärker
es: Potenciadores de sabor, Intensificadores de sabor
fr: Exhausteurs de goût, Exhausteur de goût
hr: Pojačivači okusa
it: Esaltatori di sapidità
lt: Skonio stiprikliai
nl: Smaakversterkers
zh: 增味剂

en: Thickeners, Stabilizers, Emulsifiers
bg: Стабилизатори, Емулгатори
de: Verdickungsmittel
es: Gelificantes, Estabilizantes, Espesantes
fi: sakeutusaineet
fr: Gélifiants
hr: Zgušnjivači
it: Stabilizzanti, Emulsionanti
lt: Tirštikliai, stabilizatoriai, emulsikliai
nl: Bindmiddelen
zh: 增稠剂

en: Gelling agent for jam
fr: Gélifiant pour confitures

en: Carrageenans
es: Carragenatos, Carragenanos
fr: Carraghénanes
hr: Karagenani
la: E-407, E-407a
lt: Karageninai
nl: Carragenen
zh: 卡拉胶

en: Dried carragheen mosses, Chondrus crispus, dehydrated carragheen mosses
fr: Lichen de mer séché, pioca séché, goémon rouge séché, Lichen de mer déshydraté, pioca déshydraté, goémon rouge déshydraté, Chondrus crispus
hr: Osušene karagenske mahovine
lt: Džiovintos karageno samanos

en: North Atlantic rockweed dried or dehydrated, Ascophyllum nodosum
fr: Ascophylle noueux séché, goémon noir séché, Ascophylle noueux déshydraté, goémon noir déshydraté, Ascophyllum nodosum

en: Gelatin, Gelatine
bg: Желатин
de: Gelatine
es: Gelatina
fi: Liivate, Gelatiini
fr: Gélatine
hr: Želatinu
it: Gelatina
ja: ゼラチン
lt: Želatina
nl: Gelatines
pl: Żelatyna
zh: 明胶

en: Plant-based gelatin, Plantbased gelatin
fr: Gélifiants végétaux, gélifiant végétal
hr: Želatina na biljnoj bazi
lt: Augalinė želatina
nl: Plantaardige gelatines

en: Fresh foods, Fresh
bg: Пресни продукти
ca: Aliments frescs
de: Frische Nahrungsmittel, frisch
es: Alimentos frescos, Frescos, Productos frescos
fi: tuore
fr: Frais
he: מזון טרי
hr: Svježe namirnice
hu: Friss ételek
it: Alimenti freschi
lt: Šviežias maistas
nl: Verse producten
pl: Świeża żywność
pt: Alimentos frescos, fresco
ru: Свежие продукты
sv: Färsk mat
th: อาหารสด
zh: 新鲜食物

en: Fried foods
bg: Пържени храни
de: frittierte Lebensmittel, frittierte Speisen, frittiertes Essen
es: Fritos, Alimentos fritos, Productos fritos, Frituras
fi: Paistetut ruoat
fr: Fritures
hr: Pržena hrana
it: Cibi fritti
lt: Keptas maistas
nl: Gefrituurde producten
pt: Comidas fritas
zh: 油炸食物

en: Frozen foods, Frozen
bg: Замразени продукти
ca: Aliments congelats
da: frosne fødevarer, frost
de: Tiefkühlprodukte
es: Congelados, Productos congelados
fi: pakasteet
fr: Surgelés, surgelées
he: מזון קפוא, קפואים
hr: Smrznute namirnice
hu: Fagyasztott élelmiszer, Mirelit árú
it: Alimenti surgelati, cibi congelati, surgelati
ja: 冷凍食品
lt: Šaldytas maistas
nl: Diepvriesproducten, Diepvries
no: Frossen mat, Fryst mat, Frossenmat
pl: Produkty mrożone, Mrożonki
pt: Alimentos Congelados, Congelados
ru: Замороженные продукты
sv: Frysta matvaror
th: อาหารแช่แข็ง
tr: Dondurulmuş yiyecek, Dondurulmuş yemek, Dondurulmuş gıda
zh: 冷冻食物

en: Refrigerated foods, Refrigerated
ca: Aliments refrigerats
de: Gekühlte Nahrungsmittel, gekühlt
es: Refrigerados, Productos refrigerados
fi: Jäähdytetyt ruoat
fr: Réfrigérés, Produits réfrigérés
hr: Ohlađene namirnice
hu: Hűtött ételek
it: Alimenti refrigerati
ja: 冷蔵商品
lt: Šaltai laikomas maistas
nl: Gekoelde producten
pt: Alimentos refrigerados, refrigerados
ru: охлажденные продукты
th: อาหารแช่เย็น
zh: 冷藏食品

en: Freeze-dried foods, Lyophilized foods
de: Gefriergetrocknete Lebensmittel, Lyophilisierte Lebensmittel
es: Alimentos liofilizados
fi: Pakastekuivatut ruoat
fr: Aliments lyophilisées
hr: Liofiliziranu hranu
it: Alimenti essiccati al gelo
lt: Šalčiu džiovinti maisto produktai, liofilizuoti maisto produktai
nl: Gevriesdroogde producten
ru: Лиофилизированные продукты
zh: 冻干食品

en: Freeze-dried plant-based foods, Lyophilized plant-based foods
de: Gefriergetrocknete pflanzliche Lebensmittel
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal liofilizados
fi: Pakastekuivatut kasvipohjaiset ruoat
fr: Aliments d'origine végétale lyophilisées
hr: Liofiliziranu hranu biljnog podrijetla
it: Alimenti a base vegetale essiccati surgelati
lt: Šalčiu džiovinti augaliniai maisto produktai, liofilizuoti augaliniai maisto produktai
nl: Plantaardige gevriesdroogde producten

en: Frozen fried potatoes
da: Frosne stegte kartofler
de: Gefrorene Pommes
es: Papas fritas congeladas
fi: Esipaistetut perunapakasteet
fr: Pommes de terre normales préfrites surgelées
hr: Smrznuti prženi krumpir
it: Patate fritte congelate
lt: Šaldytos keptos bulvės
nl: Diepvries aardappelproducten
pl: mrożone ziemniaki
pt: Batatas fritas congeladas
ru: Замороженый картофель фри

en: Frozen mashed potatoes
da: Frosne kartoffelmos
fr: Purées de pommes de terre surgelée, Purée de pommes de terre surgelée
hr: Smrznuti pire krumpir
lt: Šaldyta bulvių košė

en: Frozen potato fries, Frozen fries, Frozen chips, Frozen french fries
bg: Замразени пържени картофи
da: Frosne pomfritter
de: Tiefkühl-Pommes
es: Patatas fritas congeladas
fi: Ranskanperunapakasteet, Pakasteranskalaiset
fr: Frites surgelées, Pommes de terre préfrites surgelées
hr: Smrznuti krumpirići
it: Patatine surgelate
lt: Šaldytos bulvytės, Šaldytos gruzdintos bulvytės
nl: Diepvriespatatten
pl: Frytki mrożone